Ohio, session 136, HB554.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 9.18, 1333.96, 1333.97, and 1333.98 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 9.18. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Governmental entity" means the state or a political subdivision, or any private person or business acting as an agent of the state or a political subdivision, that accepts payments from people at a physical location. (2) "Political subdivision" has the same meaning as in section 9.48 of the Revised Code. (3) "State" has the same meaning as in section 2744.01 of the Revised Code. (B) For any debt, purchase, or transaction totaling five hundred dollars or less, a governmental entity shall accept cash when offered as payment. (C) A governmental entity shall not charge a person making a cash payment a higher price compared to the price charged to a person not paying with cash. Sec. 1333.96. (A) As used in this section, "at retail" includes any retail transaction conducted in person and excludes any telephone, mail, or internet-based transaction. (B) A person selling or offering for sale goods or services at retail shall comply with the following requirements: (1) Accept cash when offered by a buyer as payment for any debt, purchase, or transaction totaling five hundred dollars or less; (2) Provide at least one point-of-sale station, either automated or operated by a person, that allows a buyer to pay using cash as payment; (3) Not charge a person making a cash payment a higher price compared to the price charged to a person not paying with cash. Sec. 1333.97. The requirements stated in section 1333.96 of the Revised Code do not apply to a person selling goods or services at an airport. Sec. 1333.98. A violation of section 1333.96 of the Revised Code is an unfair or deceptive act or practice in violation of section 1345.02 of the Revised Code. A person injured by a violation of section 1333.96 of the Revised Code has a cause of action and is entitled to the same relief available to a consumer under section 1345.09 of the Revised Code. All powers and remedies available to the attorney general to enforce sections 1345.01 to 1345.13 of the Revised Code are available to the attorney general to enforce section 1333.96 of the Revised Code.